District of Columbia statutes.
5-1054

Penalties in lieu of discipline for members in conditional retirement.

(a)

The Department shall set the level of discipline for a member in conditional retirement as if he or she continued to be a member of the Department.

(b)

A member in conditional retirement who would have received suspension as discipline had he or she remained a member of the Department shall be assessed a penalty of not less than $100 and not greater than $5,000, depending on the length of suspension.

(c)

If a member in conditional retirement would have been terminated from the Department as discipline for serious misconduct, the member shall be assessed a penalty of not less than $1,000 and not greater than $5,000 in the discretion of the Chief, pursuant to written standards developed by the Chief.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 514
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 2(b), 62 DCR 485